Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-5,218
Registration of conveyances; when required.

Conveyances shall be registered at the time they are completed and placed in service.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2510;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 54;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 23.